Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.70, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Nonprofit conservation clubs. new text end new text begin Sales to nonprofit conservation clubs are exempt. For purposes of this subdivision, "nonprofit conservation club" means an organization exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that provides instruction, training, and facilities for shooting handguns or rifles. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end